New York, session 2025-2026, A9535.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1222-a to read as follows: 3 § 1222-a. Transportation of dogs; enclosure or restraint requirements. 4 1. No person shall operate a motor vehicle as defined in section one 5 hundred twenty-five of this chapter while transporting a dog in the back 6 of such motor vehicle in a space intended for any load, unless: 7 (a) such space is enclosed or has side and tail racks to a height of 8 not less than forty-six inches extending vertically from the floor; 9 (b) the motor vehicle has installed means of preventing the dog from 10 being ejected; or 11 (c) the dog is cross-tethered to the vehicle or is protected by a 12 secured container or cage, in a manner which will prevent the dog from 13 being ejected from the motor vehicle. 14 2. The provisions of this section shall not apply to: 15 (a) the transportation of a dog by its owner, who either owns or is 16 employed by a ranching or farming operation and is traveling on a road 17 in a rural area or is traveling to or from a livestock auction; 18 (b) the transportation of a dog for purposes associated with ranching 19 or farming; or 20 (c) the transportation of a dog on roadways with a speed limit under 21 fifty-five miles per hour. 22 3. (a) The first conviction of a violation of the provisions of this 23 section shall result in a fine of not less than fifty dollars nor more 24 than one hundred dollars. 25 (b) The second conviction within a year of a violation of the 26 provisions of this section shall result in a fine of not less than 27 seventy-five dollars nor more than two hundred dollars. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02745-01-5 A. 9535 2 1 (c) The third and subsequent convictions within a year of the 2 provisions of this section shall result in a fine of not less than one 3 hundred dollars nor more than two hundred fifty dollars for each such 4 conviction. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.